Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1268.02
Bond; form.

The bond referred to in section 72-1268.01 shall be in substance as follows:

Know all Persons by these Presents, That we .......... as principals, and .......... as sureties, are held and firmly bound unto the State of Nebraska, in the just and full sum of .......... Dollars, for the payment of which, well and truly to be made, we bind ourselves, our heirs, executors, and administrators, jointly and severally, by these presents. Dated the .......... day of .................... A.D. ................ .

Whereas, such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, in consideration of the deposit of certain of the money of the State of Nebraska for safekeeping with and in the .......... bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution of .......... the amount whereof shall be subject to withdrawal or diminution by the state investment officer as the requirements of the state shall demand, and which amount may be increased or decreased as the state investment officer may determine.

Now, Therefor, if such .................... bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution of ........................... shall at the end of every month render to the state investment officer a statement in duplicate showing the daily balance of the state money held by it during the month next preceding, and how the same has been credited, and shall well and truly keep all such sums of money so deposited or to be deposited as aforesaid subject to the check and order of the state investment officer as aforesaid, and shall pay over the same, and each and every part thereof, upon the written demand of the state investment officer, and to his or her successor in office as shall be by him or her demanded, and shall in all respects save and keep the people of the State of Nebraska and the state investment officer harmless and indemnified for and by reason of the making of such deposit or deposits, then this obligation shall be void and of no effect, otherwise to be and remain in full force and virtue.

Laws 1985, LB 614, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 10.